Hawaii statutes.
[§583A-106] Effect of child-custody
determination. A child-custody determination made by a court of this State
that had jurisdiction under this chapter binds all persons who have been served
in accordance with the laws of this State or notified in accordance with
section 583A-108 or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court, and
who have been given an opportunity to be heard. As to those persons, the
determination is conclusive as to all decided issues of law and fact except to
the extent the determination is modified. [L 2002, c 124, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next